California statutes. Public Resources Code
 provided in paragraph (2), the endowment shall invest and manage any funds it receives so that the investments shall provide a source of income in perpetuity and the principal amount consisting of charitable contributions and donations, including cost savings donated pursuant to Section 6618 of the Fish and Game Code, shall not be spent. Any returns on investments made by the endowment are the only funds that shall be available for expenditure by the endowment.

(2) Ten percent of any funds received by the endowment pursuant to Section 6618 of the Fish and Game Code in a calendar year shall be allocated by the endowment board, pursuant to Section 71552, as grants for projects or programs consistent with the purpose of this chapter within 24 months of receipt of the funds. The majority of these funds shall be granted to state agencies engaged in coastal and ocean protection.

(d) The
 endowment shall invest and manage any funds it receives in accordance with the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code).

(e) The accounts of the endowment shall be audited annually in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards by independent certified public accountants.

(f) The financial transactions of the endowment for any fiscal year may be audited by the California State Auditor’s Office.

(g) Each recipient of assistance by grant, contract, or loan pursuant to this division shall keep records reasonably necessary to disclose fully the amount of the assistance, the disposition of the assistance, the total cost of the project or undertaking in connection with which the assistance is given or used, the amount and
 nature of that portion of the cost of the project or undertaking supplied by other sources, and other records that will facilitate an effective audit. Each recipient of a fixed price contract awarded pursuant to competitive bidding procedures is exempt from this subdivision.

(h) The endowment, or its authorized representative, and the California State Auditor’s Office shall have access to any records necessary for the purpose of auditing and examining all funds received or expended by the recipients of assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 281, Sec. 41.   (SB 1395)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

71561.

The endowment funds shall be administered and managed in accordance with all of the following:

(a) Reasonably prudent investor standards that will give the fund the capacity to achieve reasonable rates of return on investment similar to those of other prudent investors for long-term investments.

(b) Use of generally accepted accounting practices, and
 expenditure and investing procedures.

(c) Investment policies that are consistent with the Uniform Prudent Investor Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 16045) of Chapter 1 of Part 4 of Division 9 of the Probate Code), and with the Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act (Part 7 (commencing with Section 18501) of Division 9 of the Probate Code), as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

71562.

Funds held by the endowment shall revert to the state or to another public agency or nonprofit organization approved by the state if the endowment does any of the following:

(a) Ceases operations.

(b) Is dissolved.

(c) Becomes bankrupt or insolvent.

(d) Fails to perform its fiduciary duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 38. CALIFORNIA CLEAN COAST ACT [72400. - 72442.]



CHAPTER 1. Findings and Declarations [72400. - 72401.]

72400.

The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(a) California is home to four of the 13 national marine sanctuaries. These areas support some of the world’s most diverse marine ecosystems and are home to numerous mammals, seabirds, fish, invertebrates, and plants.

(b) The protection and enhancement of the quality of the marine waters of the state and marine sanctuaries, and the protection of public health and the environment, requires that the release from large passenger vessels and oceangoing ships of hazardous waste, other waste, sewage sludge, and oily bilgewater, into the marine waters of the state and marine sanctuaries, and the release of graywater by large passenger ships into the marine waters of the state, should be prohibited.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 764, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2005, Ch. 588, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

72401.

The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(a) To protect and enhance the quality of the marine waters of the state all of the following should be prohibited:

(1) The release of graywater or sewage by a large passenger vessel into the marine waters of the state or a marine sanctuary.

(2) The release of hazardous waste, other waste, sewage sludge, or oily bilgewater by a large passenger vessel or oceangoing ship into the marine waters of the state or a marine sanctuary.

(3) The release of graywater or sewage by an oceangoing ship into the
 marine waters of the state or a marine sanctuary.

(b) In response to an application from the State of California pursuant to this division, beginning March 2012, the United States Environmental Protection Agency prohibited the discharge of all sewage from large passenger vessels and large oceangoing ships, and created a No Discharge Zone along California’s 1,624-mile coastline from Mexico to Oregon and surrounding islands, the largest No Discharge Zone in the nation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 279, Sec. 1.   (SB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [72410. - 72410.]

72410.

(a) Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this section govern this division.

(b) “Board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(c) “Commission” means the State Lands Commission.

(d) “Graywater” means drainage from dishwasher, shower, laundry, bath, and washbasin drains, but does not include drainage from toilets, urinals, hospitals, or cargo spaces.

(e) “Hazardous waste” has the meaning set forth in Section 25117 of the Health and Safety Code, but does not include sewage.

(f) “Large passenger vessel” or “vessel” means a vessel of 300 gross registered tons or greater that is engaged in the carrying of passengers for hire, excluding all of the following vessels:

(1) Vessels without berths or overnight accommodations for passengers.

(2) Noncommercial vessels, warships, vessels operated by nonprofit entities as determined by the Internal Revenue Service, and vessels operated by the state, the United States, or a foreign government.

(3) Oceangoing ships, as defined in subdivision (j).

(g) “Marine waters of the state” means waters within the area bounded by the mean high tide line to the three-mile state waters limit, from the Oregon border to the Mexican border.

(h) “Marine sanctuary” means marine waters of the state in the Channel Islands National Marine Sanctuary, Cordell Bank National Marine Sanctuary, Gulf of the Farallones National Marine Sanctuary, or Monterey Bay National Marine Sanctuary.

(i) “Medical waste” means medical waste subject to regulation pursuant to Part 14 (commencing with Section 117600) of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(j) “Oceangoing ship” means a private, commercial, government, or military vessel of 300 gross registered tons or more calling on California ports or places.

(k) “Oil” has the meaning set forth in Section 8750.

(l) “Oily bilgewater” includes bilgewater that contains used lubrication oils, oil sludge and slops, fuel and oil sludge, used oil, used
 fuel and fuel filters, and oily waste.

(m) “Operator” has the meaning set forth in Section 651 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(n) “Other waste” means photography laboratory chemicals, dry cleaning chemicals, or medical waste.

(o) “Owner” has the meaning set forth in Section 651 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(p) “Release” means discharging or disposing of wastes into the environment.

(q) “Sewage” has the meaning set forth in Section 775.5 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, including material that has been collected or treated through a marine sanitation device as that term is used in Section 312 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1322) or material that is a byproduct
 of sewage treatment.

(r) “Sewage sludge” has the meaning set forth in Section 122.2 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(s) “Sufficient holding tank capacity” means a holding tank of sufficient capacity to contain sewage and graywater while the oceangoing ship is within the marine waters of the state.

(t) “Waste” means hazardous waste and other waste.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 176.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Prohibited Releases [72420. - 72425.]

72420.

(a) If the appropriate federal agencies approve an application made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 72440, or if the board determines that an application is not required, an owner or operator of a large passenger vessel or oceangoing ship shall not release, or permit anyone to release, any sewage sludge from the vessel into the marine waters of the state or a marine sanctuary.

(b) If the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency approves the application for sewage release made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 72440, or if the board determines that an application is not required, an owner or operator of an oceangoing ship with sufficient holding
 tank capacity shall not release, or permit anyone to release, any sewage from the vessel into the marine waters of the state or a marine sanctuary.

(c) If the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency approves the application for sewage release made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 72440, or if the board determines that an application is not required, an owner or operator of a large passenger vessel shall not release, or permit anyone to release, any sewage from the vessel into the marine waters of the state or a marine sanctuary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 279, Sec. 3.   (SB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

72420.2.

(a) An owner or operator of a large passenger vessel shall not release, or permit anyone to release, from the vessel, graywater into the marine waters of the state or a marine sanctuary.

(b) An owner or operator of a large passenger vessel or oceangoing ship shall not release, or permit anyone to release, from the vessel, hazardous waste, other waste, or oily bilgewater into the marine waters of the state or a marine sanctuary.

(c) An owner or operator of an oceangoing ship with sufficient holding tank capacity shall not release, or permit anyone to release, from the vessel, graywater into the marine waters of the
 state or a marine sanctuary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 279, Sec. 5.   (SB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

72421.

(a) The owner or operator shall notify the California Emergency Management Agency immediately, but not longer than 30 minutes, after discovery of any of the following:

(1) A large passenger vessel release of graywater into the marine waters of the state or a marine sanctuary.

(2) A large passenger vessel release of sewage into the marine waters of the state or a marine sanctuary.

(3) A large passenger vessel or oceangoing ship release of hazardous waste, other waste, sewage sludge, or oily bilgewater into the marine waters of the state or a marine sanctuary.

(4) An oceangoing ship with sufficient holding tank capacity release of sewage or graywater into the marine waters of the state or a marine sanctuary.

(b) The owner or operator shall include all of the following in the notification required pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) Date of the release.

(2) Time of the release.

(3) Location, by latitude and longitude, of the release.

(4) Volume of the release.

(5) Source of the release.

(6) Remedial action taken to prevent future releases.

(c) The California Emergency Management Agency shall transmit the notification required by subdivision (a) to the board and the Department of Fish and Game immediately, but not longer than 30 minutes, after receiving the notification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 279, Sec. 6.   (SB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

72423.

An oceangoing ship with sufficient holding tank capacity and capability for transfer shall either hold on board or shall transfer sewage and graywater to a pumpout facility, if that facility is available and accessible for the oceangoing ship where the ship is docked, and shall not discharge sewage or graywater within the marine waters of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 292, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

72425.

(a) (1) If the master, owner, operator, agent, or person in charge of an oceangoing ship has operated, or has caused to be operated, the oceangoing ship in the marine waters of the state during 2006, that master, owner, operator, agent, or person in charge shall provide the information described in subdivision (b) in electronic or written form to the commission upon the vessel’s departure from its first port or place of call in California beginning in 2006.

(2) The information described in subdivision (b) shall be submitted on a form developed by the commission.

(b) The master, owner, operator, or person in charge of the oceangoing vessel shall maintain on board the vessel, in written or electronic form, records that include all of the following information:

(1) Vessel information, including all of the following:

(A) Name.

(B) International Maritime Organization number or official number if the International Maritime Organization number has not been assigned.

(C) Vessel type.

(D) Owner or operator.

(E) Gross tonnage.

(F) Keel laid date.

(G) Port of registry.

(H) Typical or required number of crew.

(2) Graywater information, including the vessel’s ability to store graywater while in California waters and size and capacity of any graywater holding tanks, as measured in metric tons.

(3) Blackwater information, including the vessel’s ability to store blackwater while in California waters and size and capacity of any blackwater holding tanks, as measured in metric tons.

(4) Marine sanitation devices information, including number, size, and nature of devices on the vessel treating sewage prior to discharge.

(5) Connections to ensure transfer of sewage and graywater to pumpout facilities.

(6) California port of call information, including expected number of calls, in days, in ports within the state during 2006.

(7) Certification of accurate information, including the printed name, title, and signature of the master, owner, operator, or person in charge, or responsible officer attesting to the accuracy of the information provided.

(c) The commission shall submit the reported information to the board on or before February 1, 2007. The board shall submit the reported information to the Legislature on or before October 1, 2007. The board may submit the report to the Legislature in an electronic form.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 588, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Penalties [72430. - 72430.]

72430.

(a) A person who violates Section 72420 or 72420.2 is subject to a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation.

(b) The civil penalty imposed for each separate violation pursuant to this section is separate from, and in addition to, any other civil penalty imposed for a separate violation pursuant to this section or any other provision of law.

(c) In determining the amount of a civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section, the court shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the nature, circumstance, extent, and gravity of the violation. In making this determination,
 the court shall consider the degree of toxicity and volume of the release, the extent of harm caused by the violation, whether the effects of the violation may be reversed or mitigated, and with respect to the defendant, the ability to pay, the effect of a civil penalty on the ability to continue in business, all voluntary cleanup efforts undertaken, the prior history of violations, the gravity of the behavior, the economic benefit, if any, resulting from the violation, and all other matters the court determines justice may require.

(d) (1) A civil action brought under this section may only be brought in accordance with this subdivision. That civil action may be brought by the Attorney General upon complaint or request by the Department of Fish and Game or the appropriate California regional water quality control board, or by a district attorney or city attorney.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 13223 of the Water Code, a regional water quality control board may delegate to its executive officer authority to request the Attorney General for judicial enforcement under this section.

(3) If a district attorney or city attorney brings an action under this section, the action shall be in the name of the people of the State of California.

(4) An action relating to the same violation may be joined or consolidated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 279, Sec. 7.   (SB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Miscellaneous [72440. - 72442.]

72440.

(a) (1) The board shall determine whether it is necessary to apply to the federal government for the state to prohibit the release of sewage or sewage sludge from large passenger vessels, sewage from oceangoing ships with sufficient holding tank capacity, and sewage sludge from oceangoing ships, into the marine waters of the state or to prohibit the release of sewage sludge from large passenger vessels and oceangoing ships into marine sanctuaries, as described in Section 72420. If the board determines that application is necessary for either sewage or sewage sludge, or both, it shall apply to the appropriate federal agencies, as determined by the board, to authorize the state to prohibit the release of sewage or sewage sludge, or both, as necessary, from large
 passenger vessels, sewage from oceangoing ships with sufficient holding tank capacity, and sewage sludge from oceangoing ships, into the marine waters of the state and, if necessary, to authorize the state to prohibit the release of sewage sludge from large passenger vessels and oceangoing ships into marine sanctuaries.

(2) It is not the Legislature’s intent to establish for the marine waters of the state a no discharge zone for sewage from all vessels, but only for a class of vessels.

(b) The board shall request the appropriate federal agencies, as determined by the board, to prohibit the release of sewage sludge and oily bilgewater, except under the circumstances specified in Section 72441, by large passenger vessels and oceangoing ships, in all of the waters that are in the Channel Islands National Marine Sanctuary, Cordell Bank National Marine Sanctuary, Gulf of the Farallones
 National Marine Sanctuary, and Monterey Bay National Marine Sanctuary, that are not in the state waters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 279, Sec. 8.   (SB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

72440.1.

The board shall request the appropriate federal agencies, as determined by the board, to prohibit the release of waste by large passenger vessels or oceangoing ships in all of the waters in the Channel Islands National Marine Sanctuary, Cordell Bank National Marine Sanctuary, Gulf of the Farallones National Marine Sanctuary, and Monterey Bay National Marine Sanctuary; and, request, if necessary, approval of the state’s prohibition of the release of waste in the marine sanctuaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 588, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

72441.

(a) This division does not apply to either of the following:

(1) A large passenger vessel or oceangoing ship that operates in the marine waters of the state solely in innocent passage.

(2) Discharges made for the purpose of securing the safety of the large passenger vessel or oceangoing ship or saving life at sea, if reasonable precautions are taken for the purpose of preventing or minimizing the discharge.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a large passenger vessel or oceangoing ship is engaged in innocent passage if its operation in the marine waters of the state would constitute innocent
 passage under either the Convention on the Territorial Sea and Contiguous Zone, dated April 29, 1958, or the United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea, dated December 10, 1982.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 279, Sec. 9.   (SB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

72442.

The board may adopt regulations to carry out this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 488, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 43. THE SAFE DRINKING WATER, WATER QUALITY AND SUPPLY, FLOOD CONTROL, RIVER AND COASTAL PROTECTION BOND ACT OF 2006 [75001. - 75130.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [75001. - 75009.]

75001.

This Division shall be known and may be cited as the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Bond Act of 2006.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75002.

The people of California find and declare that protecting the state’s drinking water and water resources is vital to the public health, the state’s economy, and the environment.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75002.5.

The people of California further find and declare that the state’s waters are vulnerable to contamination by dangerous bacteria, polluted runoff, toxic chemicals, damage from catastrophic floods and the demands of a growing population. Therefore, actions must be taken to ensure safe drinking water and a reliable supply of water for farms, cities and businesses, as well as to protect California’s rivers, lakes, streams, beaches, bays and coastal waters, for this and future generations.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75003.

The people of California further find and declare that it is necessary and in the public interest to do all of the following:

(a) Ensure that safe drinking water is available to all Californians by:

(1) Providing for emergency assistance to communities with contaminated sources of drinking water. 

(2) Assisting small communities in making the improvements needed in their water systems to clean up and protect their drinking water from contamination.

(3) Providing grants and loans for safe drinking water and water pollution prevention projects.

(4) Protecting the water quality of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta, a key source of drinking water for 23 million Californians.

(5) Assisting each region of the state in improving local water supply reliability and water quality.

(6) Resolving water-related conflicts, improving local and regional water self-sufficiency and reducing reliance on imported water.

(b) Protect the public from catastrophic floods by identifying and mapping the areas most at risk, inspecting and repairing levees and flood control facilities, and reducing the long-term costs of flood management, reducing future flood risk and maximizing public benefits by planning, designing and implementing multi-objective flood corridor projects.

(c) Protect the rivers, lakes and streams of the state from pollution, loss of water quality, and destruction of fish and wildlife habitat.

(d) Protect the beaches, bays and coastal waters of the state for future generations.

(e) Revitalizing our communities and making them more sustainable and livable by investing in sound land use planning, local parks and urban greening.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75003.5.

The people of California further find and declare that the growth in population of the state and the impacts of climate change pose significant challenges. These challenges must be addressed through careful planning and through improvements in land use and water management that both reduce contributions to global warming and improve the adaptability of our water and flood control systems. Improvements include better integration of water supply, water quality, flood control and ecosystem protection, as well greater water use efficiency and conservation to reduce energy consumption.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75004.

It is the intent of the people that investment of public funds pursuant to this division should result in public benefits.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75005.

As used in this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Acquisition” means the acquisition of a fee interest or any other interest in real property including easements, leases and development rights.

(b) “Board” means the Wildlife Conservation Board.

(c) “California Water Plan” means the California Water Plan Update Bulletin 160-05 and subsequent revisions and amendments.

(d) “Delta” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin River Delta.

(e) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(f) “Development” includes, but is not limited to the physical improvement of real property including the construction of facilities or structures.

(g) “Disadvantaged community” means a community with a median household income less than 80% of the statewide average. “Severely disadvantaged community” means a community with a median household income less than 60% of the statewide average.

(h) “Fund” means the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006.

(i) “Interpretation” includes, but is not limited to, a visitor serving amenity that educates and communicates the significance and value of natural, historical, and cultural resources in a way that increases the understanding and enjoyment of these resources and that may utilize the expertise of a naturalist or other specialist skilled at educational interpretation.

(j) “Local conservation corps” means a program operated by a public agency or nonprofit organization that meets the requirements of Section 14406.

(k) “Nonprofit organization” means any nonprofit corporation qualified to do business in California, and qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(l) “Preservation” means rehabilitation, stabilization, restoration, development, and reconstruction, or any combination of those activities.

(m) “Protection” means those actions necessary to prevent harm or damage to persons, property or natural resources or those actions necessary to allow the continued use and enjoyment of property or natural resources and includes acquisition, development, restoration, preservation and interpretation.

(n) “Restoration” means the improvement of physical structures or facilities and, in the case of natural systems and landscape features includes, but is not limited to, projects for the control of erosion, the control and elimination of exotic species, prescribed burning, fuel hazard reduction, fencing out threats to existing or restored natural resources, road elimination, and other plant and wildlife habitat improvement to increase the natural system value of the property. Restoration projects shall include the planning, monitoring and reporting necessary to ensure successful implementation of the project objectives.

(o) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Resources Agency.

(p) “State Board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75009.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division shall be deposited in the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Fund of 2006, which is hereby created. Except as specifically provided in this division the money shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature, in the manner and for the purposes set forth in this division in accordance with the following schedule: 

(a) The sum of one billion five hundred twenty five million dollars ($1,525,000,000) for safe drinking water, water quality and other water projects in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 2.

(b) The sum of eight hundred million dollars ($800,000,000) for flood control projects in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.

(c) The sum of sixty five million dollars ($65,000,000) for statewide water management in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4.

(d) The sum of nine hundred twenty eight million dollars ($928,000,000) for the protection of rivers, lakes and streams in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5.

(e) The sum of four hundred fifty million dollars ($450,000,000) for forest and wildlife conservation in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 6.

(f) The sum of five hundred forty million dollars ($540,000,000) for the protection of beaches, bays, and coastal waters and watersheds in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 7.

(g) The sum of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) for state parks and nature education facilities in accordance with Chapter 8.

(h) The sum of five hundred eighty million dollars ($580,000,000) for sustainable communities and climate change reduction projects in accordance with Chapter 9.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Safe Drinking Water and Water Quality Projects [75020. - 75029.5.]

75020.

This chapter is intended to provide the funds necessary to address the most critical water needs of the state including the provision of safe drinking water to all Californians, the protection of water quality and the environment, and the improvement of water supply reliability.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75021.

(a) The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Health Services for grants and direct expenditures to fund emergency and urgent actions to ensure that safe drinking water supplies are available to all Californians. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Providing alternate water supplies including bottled water where necessary to protect public health.

(2) Improvements in existing water systems necessary to prevent contamination or provide other sources of safe drinking water including replacement wells.

(3) Establishing connections to an adjacent water system.

(4) Design, purchase, installation and initial operation costs for water treatment equipment and systems. 

(b) Grants and expenditures shall not exceed $250,000 per project.

(c) Direct expenditures for the purposes of this section shall be exempt from contracting and procurement requirements to the extent necessary to take immediate action to protect public health and safety.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75022.

The sum of one hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Health Services for grants for small community drinking water system infrastructure improvements and related actions to meet safe drinking water standards. Priority shall be given to projects that address chemical and nitrate contaminants, other health hazards and by whether the community is disadvantaged or severely disadvantaged. Special consideration shall be given to small communities with limited financial resources. Eligible recipients include public agencies and incorporated mutual water companies that serve disadvantaged communities. The Department of Health Services may make grants for the purpose of financing feasibility studies and to meet the eligibility requirements for a construction grant. Construction grants shall be limited to $5,000,000 per project and not more than twenty five percent of a grant may be awarded in advance of actual expenditures. The Department of Health Services may expend up to $5,000,000 of the funds allocated in this section for technical assistance to eligible communities.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75023.

For the purpose of providing the state share needed to leverage federal funds to assist communities in providing safe drinking water, the sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available for deposit into the Safe Drinking Water State Revolving Fund (Section 116760.30 of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75024.

For the purpose of providing the state share needed to leverage federal funds to assist communities in making those infrastructure investments necessary to prevent pollution of drinking water sources, the sum of eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) shall be available for deposit into the State Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund (Section 13477 of the Water Code).

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75025.

The sum of sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Health Services for the purpose of loans and grants for projects to prevent or reduce contamination of groundwater that serves as a source of drinking water. The Department of Health Services shall require repayment for costs that are subsequently recovered from parties responsible for the contamination. The Legislature may enact legislation necessary to implement this section.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75026.

(a) The sum of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) shall be available to the department for grants for projects that assist local public agencies to meet the long term water needs of the state including the delivery of safe drinking water and the protection of water quality and the environment. Eligible projects must implement integrated regional water management plans that meet the requirements of this section. Integrated regional water management plans shall identify and address the major water related objectives and conflicts within the region, consider all of the resource management strategies identified in the California Water Plan, and use an integrated, multi-benefit approach to project selection and design. Plans shall include performance measures and monitoring to document progress toward meeting plan objectives. Projects that may be funded pursuant to this section must be consistent with an adopted integrated regional water management plan or its functional equivalent as defined in the department’s Integrated Regional Water Management Guidelines, must provide multiple benefits, and must include one or more of the following project elements:

(1) Water supply reliability, water conservation and water use efficiency.

(2) Storm water capture, storage, clean-up, treatment, and management.

(3) Removal of invasive non-native species, the creation and enhancement of wetlands, and the acquisition, protection, and restoration of open space and watershed lands.

(4) Non-point source pollution reduction, management and monitoring.

(5) Groundwater recharge and management projects.

(6) Contaminant and salt removal through reclamation, desalting, and other treatment technologies and conveyance of reclaimed water for distribution to users.

(7) Water banking, exchange, reclamation and improvement of water quality.

(8) Planning and implementation of multipurpose flood management programs.

(9) Watershed protection and management.

(10) Drinking water treatment and distribution.

(11) Ecosystem and fisheries restoration and protection.

(b) The Department of Water Resources shall give preference to proposals that satisfy the following criteria:

(1) Proposals that effectively integrate water management programs and projects within a hydrologic region identified in the California Water Plan; the Regional Water Quality Control Board region or subdivision or other region or sub-region specifically identified by the department.

(2) Proposals that effectively integrate water management with land use planning.

(3) Proposals that effectively resolve significant water-related conflicts within or between regions.

(4) Proposals that contribute to the attainment of one or more of the objectives of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program.

(5) Proposals that address statewide priorities.

(6) Proposals that address critical water supply or water quality needs for disadvantaged communities within the region.

(c) Not more than 5% of the funds provided by this section may be used for grants or direct expenditures for the development, updating or improvement of integrated regional water management plans.

(d) The department shall coordinate the provisions of this section with the program provided in Chapter 8 of Division 26.5 of the Water Code and may implement this section using existing Integrated Regional Water Management Guidelines.

(History: Added November 7, 2006, by initiative Proposition 84.)
-------------------------------------------

75027.

(a) The funding provided in Section 75026 shall be allocated to each hydrologic region as identified in the California Water Plan and listed below. For the South Coast Region, the department shall establish three sub-regions that reflect the San Diego county watersheds, the Santa Ana River watershed, and the Los Angeles–Ventura County watersheds respectively, and allocate funds to those sub-regions. The North and South Lahontan regions shall be treated as one region for the purpose of allocating funds, but the department may require separate regional plans. Funds provided in Section 75026 shall be allocated according to the following schedule: (1) North Coast$37,000,000(2) San Francisco Bay$138,000,000(3) Central Coast$52,000,000(4) Los Angeles sub-region$215,000,000(5) Santa Ana sub-region$114,000,000(6) San Diego sub-region$91,000,000(7) Sacramento River$73,000,000(8) San Joaquin River$57,000,000(9) Tulare/Kern (Tulare Lake)$60,000,000(10) North/South Lahontan$27,000,000(11) Colorado River Basin$36,000,000(12) Inter-regional/Unallocated$100,000,000
